Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,111
Drug product selection; when; pharmacist; duty.

(1) A pharmacist may drug product select except when:

(a) A practitioner designates that drug product selection is not permitted by specifying in the written, oral, or electronic prescription that there shall be no drug product selection. For written or electronic prescriptions, the practitioner shall specify "no drug product selection", "dispense as written", "brand medically necessary", or "no generic substitution" or the notation "N.D.P.S.", "D.A.W.", or "B.M.N." or words or notations of similar import to indicate that drug product selection is not permitted. The pharmacist shall note "N.D.P.S.", "D.A.W.", "B.M.N.", "no drug product selection", "dispense as written", "brand medically necessary", "no generic substitution", or words or notations of similar import on the prescription to indicate that drug product selection is not permitted if such is communicated orally by the prescribing practitioner; or

(b) A patient or designated representative or caregiver of such patient instructs otherwise.

(2) A pharmacist shall not drug product select unless:

(a) The drug product, if it is in solid dosage form, has been marked with an identification code or monogram directly on the dosage unit;

(b) The drug product has been labeled with an expiration date;

(c) The manufacturer, distributor, or packager of the drug product provides reasonable services, as determined by the board, to accept the return of drug products that have reached their expiration date; and

(d) The manufacturer, distributor, or packager maintains procedures for the recall of unsafe or defective drug products.

(3) If a pharmacist receives a prescription for a biological product and chooses to dispense an interchangeable biological product for the prescribed product, the pharmacist must advise the patient or the patient's caregiver that drug product selection has occurred.

(4) Within three business days after the dispensing of a biological product, the dispensing pharmacist or the pharmacist's designee shall make an entry of the specific product provided to the patient, including the name of the product and the manufacturer. The communication shall be conveyed by making an entry that is electronically accessible to the prescriber through an interoperable electronic medical records system, electronic prescribing technology, a pharmacy benefit management system, or a pharmacy record. Entry into an electronic records system described in this subsection is presumed to provide notice to the prescriber. Otherwise, the pharmacist shall communicate the biological product dispensed to the prescriber using facsimile, telephone, electronic transmission, or other prevailing means, except that communication shall not be required if (a) there is no interchangeable biological product approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for the product prescribed or (b) a refill prescription is not changed from the product dispensed on the prior filling.

Laws 1977, LB 103, § 3;

Laws 1978, LB 689, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 476, § 22;

Laws 1989, LB 353, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 363, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 149;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 174;

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 16;

Laws 2005, LB 382, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 54;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 83;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 71-5403;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 62;

Laws 2017, LB481, § 13.